Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Merger

§§ 17-20-1101 and 17-20-1102.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-20-1103.
Merger of 2 or more cooperative utilities.

Unless this act, the articles, bylaws or the board of directors or members, acting pursuant to W.S. 17-19-1103(c) require a greater vote, a plan of merger involving two (2) or more cooperative utilities to be adopted shall be approved as provided by W.S. 17-19-1103(a)(i) and (iii) and by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of all of the members of each of the merging cooperative utilities.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 17-20-140(a)(iii).

§§ 17-20-1104 and 17-20-1105.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-20-1106.
Merger with entity other than a cooperative utility.

A cooperative utility may merge with any entity if:

The merger is permitted by the law of the state or country under whose law the entity is organized and existing and each entity complies with that law in effecting the merger;

The entity complies with W.S.

17-19-1104

if it is the surviving corporation or entity;

The merger is approved by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of all of the members of the cooperative utility; and

The provisions in W.S.

17-20-1201

are met.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.